Wyoming, session 2025, HB0127.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-21-105(g) and by creating a new
subsection (k) is amended to read:

35-21-105. Order of protection; contents; remedies;
order not to affect title to property; conditions.

(g) Except as provided in subsection (k) of this
section, no act of the petitioner or the respondent may be
HB0127

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0480
construed to waive or nullify any provision of an order of
protection.

(k) A request by the victim for the perpetrator to
violate an order of protection issued under this section or
a temporary order of protection issued under W.S. 35-21-104
shall constitute an affirmative defense to a charge of
violation of the order by the perpetrator.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0127